District of Columbia statutes.
32-223

Severability.

If any provision of this subchapter or the application of such provision to certain circumstances be held invalid, the remainder of this subchapter and the application of such provision to circumstances other than those as to which it is held invalid shall not be affected thereby.

May 29, 1928, 45 Stat. 1006, ch. 908, § 28
renumbered as § 24 June 15, 1976, D.C. Law 1-68, § 2(28), 23 DCR 528
1981 Ed., § 36-522.
1973 Ed., § 36-226.